Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Criminal Background Investigations

154A.650.
Criminal background investigations — Duties of corporation or its security division.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall, at the request of the division of security, perform full criminal background investigations on all potential vendors and potential employees of the corporation at the level of division director and above and at any level within the division of security. The corporation shall reimburse the Department of Kentucky State Police for the actual costs of such investigations.

The corporation or its division of security shall:

Conduct criminal background investigations and credit investigations on all potential retailers and investigate all potential employees of the corporation not referred to in subsection (1) of this section;

Supervise ticket validation and lottery drawings;

Inspect at times determined solely by the division, the facilities of any vendor in order to determine the integrity of the vendor’s product and in order to determine whether the vendor is in compliance with its contract;

Report any suspected violations of this chapter to the appropriate Commonwealth’s attorney, or the Attorney General and law enforcement agencies; and

Upon request, provide assistance to any Commonwealth’s attorney, the Attorney General or law enforcement agency investigating a violation of this chapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 19, effective December 15, 1988; 2007, ch. 85, § 163, effective June 26, 2007.